Tennessee, session 114, HB0525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1513, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
The department of agriculture is urged to study the effects of the sale and
distribution of vapor products to, and the use of such vapor products by, persons under
twenty-one (21) years of age and is encouraged to make recommendations to the
legislature with regard to reducing such sale, distribution, and use.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0525
002458
- 1 -